Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Public Utilities Generally

278.010.
Definitions for KRS 278.010 to 278.450, 278.541 to 278.544, 278.546 to 278.5462, and 278.990.

As used in KRS

278.010

to

278.450

,

278.541

to

278.544

,

278.546

to

278.546

2, and

278.990

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Corporation” includes private, quasipublic, and public corporations, and all boards, agencies, and instrumentalities thereof, associations, joint-stock companies, and business trusts;

“Person” includes natural persons, partnerships, corporations, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest;

“Utility” means any person except a regional wastewater commission established pursuant to KRS

65.8905

and, for purposes of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), (d), and (f) of this subsection, a city, who owns, controls, operates, or manages any facility used or to be used for or in connection with:

The generation, production, transmission, or distribution of electricity to or for the public, for compensation, for lights, heat, power, or other uses;

The production, manufacture, storage, distribution, sale, or furnishing of natural or manufactured gas, or a mixture of same, to or for the public, for compensation, for light, heat, power, or other uses;

The transporting or conveying of gas, crude oil, or other fluid substance by pipeline to or for the public, for compensation;

The diverting, developing, pumping, impounding, distributing, or furnishing of water to or for the public, for compensation;

The transmission or conveyance over wire, in air, or otherwise, of any message by telephone or telegraph for the public, for compensation; or

The collection, transmission, or treatment of sewage for the public, for compensation, if the facility is a subdivision collection, transmission, or treatment facility plant that is affixed to real property and is located in a county containing a city of the first class or is a sewage collection, transmission, or treatment facility that is affixed to real property, that is located in any other county, and that is not subject to regulation by a metropolitan sewer district or any sanitation district created pursuant to KRS Chapter 220;

“Retail electric supplier” means any person, firm, corporation, association, or cooperative corporation, excluding municipal corporations, engaged in the furnishing of retail electric service;

“Certified territory” shall mean the areas as certified by and pursuant to KRS

278.017

;

“Existing distribution line” shall mean an electric line which on June 16, 1972, is being or has been substantially used to supply retail electric service and includes all lines from the distribution substation to the electric consuming facility but does not include any transmission facilities used primarily to transfer energy in bulk;

“Retail electric service” means electric service furnished to a consumer for ultimate consumption, but does not include wholesale electric energy furnished by an electric supplier to another electric supplier for resale;

“Electric-consuming facilities” means everything that utilizes electric energy from a central station source;

“Generation and transmission cooperative” or “G&T” means a utility formed under KRS Chapter 279 that provides electric generation and transmission services;

“Distribution cooperative” means a utility formed under KRS Chapter 279 that provides retail electric service;

“Facility” includes all property, means, and instrumentalities owned, operated, leased, licensed, used, furnished, or supplied for, by, or in connection with the business of any utility;

“Rate” means any individual or joint fare, toll, charge, rental, or other compensation for service rendered or to be rendered by any utility, and any rule, regulation, practice, act, requirement, or privilege in any way relating to such fare, toll, charge, rental, or other compensation, and any schedule or tariff or part of a schedule or tariff thereof;

“Service” includes any practice or requirement in any way relating to the service of any utility, including the voltage of electricity, the heat units and pressure of gas, the purity, pressure, and quantity of water, and in general the quality, quantity, and pressure of any commodity or product used or to be used for or in connection with the business of any utility, but does not include Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP) service;

“Adequate service” means having sufficient capacity to meet the maximum estimated requirements of the customer to be served during the year following the commencement of permanent service and to meet the maximum estimated requirements of other actual customers to be supplied from the same lines or facilities during such year and to assure such customers of reasonable continuity of service;

“Commission” means the Public Service Commission of Kentucky;

“Commissioner” means one (1) of the members of the commission;

“Demand-side management” means any conservation, load management, or other utility activity intended to influence the level or pattern of customer usage or demand, including home energy assistance programs;

“Affiliate” means a person that controls or that is controlled by, or is under common control with, a utility;

“Control” means the power to direct the management or policies of a person through ownership, by contract, or otherwise;

“CAM” means a cost allocation manual which is an indexed compilation and documentation of a company’s cost allocation policies and related procedures;

“Nonregulated activity” means the provision of competitive retail gas or electric services or other products or services over which the commission exerts no regulatory authority;

“Nonregulated” means that which is not subject to regulation by the commission;

“Regulated activity” means a service provided by a utility or other person, the rates and charges of which are regulated by the commission;

“USoA” means uniform system of accounts which is a system of accounts for public utilities established by the FERC and adopted by the commission;

“Arm’s length” means the standard of conduct under which unrelated parties, each party acting in its own best interest, would negotiate and carry out a particular transaction;

“Subsidize” means the recovery of costs or the transfer of value from one (1) class of customer, activity, or business unit that is attributable to another;

“Solicit” means to engage in or offer for sale a good or service, either directly or indirectly and irrespective of place or audience;

“USDA” means the United States Department of Agriculture;

“FERC” means the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission;

“SEC” means the Securities and Exchange Commission;

“Commercial mobile radio services” has the same meaning as in 47 C.F.R. sec. 20.3 and includes the term “wireless” and service provided by any wireless real time two (2) way voice communication device, including radio-telephone communications used in cellular telephone service, personal communications service, and the functional or competitive equivalent of a radio-telephone communications line used in cellular telephone service, a personal communications service, or a network radio access line; and

“Voice over Internet Protocol” or “VoIP” has the same meaning as in federal law.

History.

3952-1: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 209; 1964, ch. 195, § 1; 1972, ch. 83, § 1; 1974, ch. 118, § 1; 1978, ch. 379, § 1, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1994, ch. 238, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 101, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 511, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 11, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2002, ch. 365, § 15, effective April 24, 2002; 2005, ch. 109, § 2, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 239, § 5, effective July 12, 2006; 2011, ch. 98, § 20, effective June 8, 2011.

278.012.
Water association subject to Public Service Commission — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the Kentucky Revised Statutes, any water association formed for the purpose of furnishing water or sewer services to the general public pursuant to KRS Chapter 273 is deemed to be and shall be a public utility and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission in the same manner and to the same extent as any other utility as defined in KRS

278.010

, except:

As provided in KRS

278.023

; or

When a wholesale supplier selling water or providing sewage treatment to a water association increases its rates, the water association shall have the authority to increase its rates commensurate with the wholesale supplier without prior approval by the commission.

Within twenty (20) days after any such increase in rates, the association shall file its revised tariffs with the commission, together with a copy of the notice from its wholesale supplier showing the increase in the rate charged to the utility, and a statement of the volume of purchased water used or sewage treated to calculate the increase in rates. The commission shall approve the filing or establish revised rates by order no later than thirty (30) days after the above documents are filed with it. Prior to or at the time of the first billing of the new rates, the district shall give notice to its customers of the increase.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 310, § 1; 1978, ch. 379, § 2, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 495, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 12, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 276, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Since KRS

74.012

and this section when read together simply reflect the legislative intent to bring private corporations furnishing water to the general public within the regulatory power of the public service commission, regulation as applied to a private water utility did not convert the utility into a governmental agency as envisioned by KRS

42.330

(11) (now repealed); and therefore a water system organized under KRS Chapter 273 could not qualify under KRS

42.330

(now repealed) to use the Coal Severance Economic Aid Fund since it was not one of the beneficiary agencies listed in KRS 42.330.

OAG 77-524

. (Opinion prior to 1978 amendment.)

278.015.
Water district; combined water, gas, or sewer district; or water commission a public utility subject to Public Service Commission — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of KRS Chapter 74, any water district; combined water, gas, or sewer district; or water commission, except a joint commission created under the provisions of KRS

74.420

to

74.520

, shall be a public utility and shall be subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Service Commission in the same manner and to the same extent as any other utility as defined in KRS

278.010

, except:

As provided in KRS

278.023

; or

When a wholesale supplier selling water or providing sewage treatment to a water district; combined water, gas, or sewer district; or water commission increases its rates, the water district or combined water, gas, or sewer district shall have the authority to increase its rates commensurate with the wholesale supplier without prior approval by the commission.

Within twenty (20) days after any such increase in rates, the district shall file its revised tariffs with the commission, together with a copy of the notice from its wholesale supplier showing the increase in the rate charged to the utility, and a statement of the volume of purchased water used or sewage treated to calculate the increase in rates. The commission shall approve the filing or establish revised rates by order no later than thirty (30) days after the above documents are filed with it. Prior to or at the time of the first billing of the new rates, the district shall give notice to its customers of the increase.

History.

Enact. Acts 1964, ch. 195, § 2; 1978, ch. 379, § 3, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 495, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 12, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 276, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 122, § 10, effective July 15, 1996.

278.0152.
Water utility permitted to charge a tapping fee for installing service to customer.

Any utility subject to this chapter which is engaged in the distributing or furnishing of water to or for the public, for compensation, may, subject to the approval of the commission, make a charge or “tapping fee” for installing service to its customers.

The “tapping fee” shall include charges for a service tap, meter, meter vault, and installation thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A water district’s regulations, concerning water and sewage, can extend only to its own water and sewage facilities.

OAG 69-562

.

278.0154.
Water district or water association may assess customer a late payment charge of 10% of amount billed — How charge assessed and applied — Commission without power to affect late payment charge — Waiver of late payment charge.

Any water district or water association formed for the purpose of furnishing water or sewer services to the general public for compensation pursuant to KRS Chapter 74 or 273 may assess a customer who fails to pay a bill for rendered services by the due date shown on the bill a late payment charge of ten percent (10%) of the amount billed.

A late payment charge or fee shall not be assessed more than once per billing cycle or on any part of the late payment charge.

Any payment received by a water district or water association shall first be applied to the portion of the bill for service rendered.

The commission shall not modify, reject, discontinue, abolish, or suspend the operation of a late payment charge that is provided for currently, or has been provided for in the past, in a water district or water association tariff.

A water district or water association shall not be required to demonstrate to the commission that the late payment charge is required to recover customer-specific costs incurred that would otherwise result in a monetary loss to the utility or increased rates to other customers to whom no benefits accrue from the service provided or actions taken.

Any late payment charge imposed by a water district or water association shall be waived for any bill or portion of a bill for which a customer has received third- party billing assistance through the Low-Income Household Drinking Water and Wastewater Emergency Assistance Program or from another public or charitable source.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 158, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

278.016.
Commonwealth to be divided into geographical service areas.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest that, in order to encourage the orderly development of retail electric service, to avoid wasteful duplication of distribution facilities, to avoid unnecessary encumbering of the landscape of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, to prevent the waste of materials and natural resources, for the public convenience and necessity and to minimize disputes between retail electric suppliers which may result in inconvenience, diminished efficiency and higher costs in serving the consumer, the state be divided into geographical areas, establishing the areas within which each retail electric supplier is to provide the retail electric service as provided in KRS

278.016

to

278.020

and, except as otherwise provided, no retail electric supplier shall furnish retail electric service in the certified territory of another retail electric supplier.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 83, § 2.

278.017.
Establishing boundaries of certified areas.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the boundaries of the certified territory of each retail electric supplier are hereby set as a line or lines substantially equidistant between its existing distribution lines and the nearest existing distribution lines of any other retail electric supplier in every direction, with the result that there is hereby certified to each retail electric supplier such area which in its entirety is located substantially in closer proximity to one of its existing distribution lines than to the nearest existing distribution line of any other retail electric supplier.

On or before one hundred twenty (120) days after June 16, 1972, or, when requested in writing by a retail electric supplier and for good cause shown, such further time as the commission may fix by order, each retail electric supplier shall file with the commission a map or maps showing all of its existing distribution lines. The commission shall prepare or cause to be prepared within one hundred twenty (120) days thereafter a map or maps of uniform scale to show, accurately and clearly, the boundaries of the certified territory of each retail electric supplier as established under subsection (1) of this section, and shall issue such map or maps of certified territory to each retail electric supplier. Any retail electric supplier who feels itself aggrieved by reason of a certification of territory pursuant to this section may protest the certification of territory within a one hundred twenty day period after issuance of the map of certified territory by the commission; and the commission shall have the power, after hearing, to revise or vacate such certified territories or portions thereof.

In such hearing, the commission shall be guided by the following conditions as they existed on June 16, 1972:

The proximity of existing distribution lines to such certified territory.

Which supplier was first furnishing retail electric service, and the age of existing facilities in the area.

The adequacy and dependability of existing distribution lines to provide dependable, high quality retail electric service at reasonable costs.

The elimination and prevention of duplication of electric lines and facilities supplying such territory. In its determination of such protest, the commission hearing shall be de novo; and neither supplier shall bear the burden of proof.

In each area, where the commission shall determine that the existing distribution lines of two or more retail electric suppliers are so intertwined or located that subsection (1) of this section cannot reasonably be applied, the commission shall, after hearing, certify the service territory or territories for the retail electric suppliers under the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 83, § 3; 1978, ch. 379, § 4, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 4, effective July 15, 1982.

278.018.
Right to serve certified territory.

Except as otherwise provided herein, each retail electric supplier shall have the exclusive right to furnish retail electric service to all electric-consuming facilities located within its certified territory, and shall not furnish, make available, render or extend its retail electric service to a consumer for use in electric-consuming facilities located within the certified territory of another retail electric supplier; provided that any retail electric supplier may extend its facilities through the certified territory of another retail electric supplier, if such extension is necessary for such supplier to connect any of its facilities or to serve its consumers within its own certified territory. In the event that a new electric-consuming facility should locate in two (2) or more adjacent certified territories, the commission shall determine which retail electric supplier shall serve said facility based on criteria in KRS 278.017(3).

Except as provided in subsections (3) and (5) of this section, any new electric-consuming facility located in an area which has not as yet been included in a map issued by the commission, pursuant to KRS 278.017(2), or certified, pursuant to KRS 278.017(4), shall be furnished retail electric service by the retail electric supplier which has an existing distribution line in closer proximity to such electric-consuming facility than is the nearest existing distribution line of any other retail electric supplier. Any disputes under this subsection shall be resolved by the commission.

The commission may, after a hearing had upon due notice, make such findings as may be supported by proof as to whether any retail electric supplier operating in a certified territory is rendering or proposes to render adequate service to an electric-consuming facility and in the event the commission finds that such retail electric supplier is not rendering or does not propose to render adequate service, the commission may enter an order specifying in what particulars such retail electric supplier has failed to render or propose to render adequate service and order that such failure be corrected within a reasonable time, such time to be fixed in such order. If the retail electric supplier so ordered to correct such failure fails to comply with such order, the commission may authorize another retail electric supplier to furnish retail electric service to such facility.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, no retail electric supplier shall furnish, make available, render or extend retail electric service to any electric-consuming facility to which such service is being lawfully furnished by another retail electric supplier on June 16, 1972, or to which retail electric service is lawfully commenced thereafter in accordance with this section by another retail electric supplier.

The provisions of KRS

278.016

to

278.020

shall not preclude any retail electric supplier from extending its service after June 16, 1972, to property and facilities owned and operated by said retail electric supplier.

Notwithstanding the effectuation of certified territories established by or pursuant to KRS

278.016

to

278.020

, and the exclusive right to service within such territory, a retail electric supplier may contract with another retail electric supplier for the purpose of allocating territories and consumers between such retail electric suppliers and designating which territories and consumers are to be served by which of said retail electric suppliers. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, a contract between retail electric suppliers as herein provided when approved by the commission shall be valid and enforceable. The commission shall approve such a contract if it finds that the contract will promote the purposes of KRS

278.016

and will provide adequate and reasonable service to all areas and consumers affected thereby.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 83, § 4; 1978, ch. 379, § 5, effective April 1, 1979.

278.020.
Certificate of convenience and necessity required for construction provision of utility service or of utility — Exceptions — Approval required for acquisition or transfer of ownership — Public hearing on proposed transmission line — Limitations upon approval of application to transfer control of utility or to abandon or cease provision of services — Hearing — Severability of provisions.

No person, partnership, public or private corporation, or combination thereof shall commence providing utility service to or for the public or begin the construction of any plant, equipment, property, or facility for furnishing to the public any of the services enumerated in KRS

278.010

, except:

Retail electric suppliers for service connections to electric-consuming facilities located within its certified territory;

Ordinary extensions of existing systems in the usual course of business; or

A water district created under KRS Chapter 74 or a water association formed under KRS Chapter 273 that undertakes a waterline extension or improvement project if the water district or water association is a Class A or B utility as defined in the uniform system of accounts established by the commission according to KRS

278.220

and:

The water line extension or improvement project will not cost more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); or

The water district or water association will not, as a result of the water line extension or improvement project, incur obligations requiring commission approval as required by KRS

278.300

.

In either case, the water district or water association shall not, as a result of the water line extension or improvement project, increase rates to its customers;

until that person has obtained from the Public Service Commission a certificate that public convenience and necessity require the service or construction.

Upon the filing of an application for a certificate, and after any public hearing which the commission may in its discretion conduct for all interested parties, the commission may issue or refuse to issue the certificate, or issue it in part and refuse it in part, except that the commission shall not refuse or modify an application submitted under KRS

278.023

without consent by the parties to the agreement.

The commission, when considering an application for a certificate to construct a base load electric generating facility, may consider the policy of the General Assembly to foster and encourage use of Kentucky coal by electric utilities serving the Commonwealth.

The commission, when considering an application for a certificate to construct an electric transmission line, may consider the interstate benefits expected to be achieved by the proposed construction or modification of electric transmission facilities in the Commonwealth.

Unless exercised within one (1) year from the grant thereof, exclusive of any delay due to the order of any court or failure to obtain any necessary grant or consent, the authority conferred by the issuance of the certificate of convenience and necessity shall be void, but the beginning of any new construction or facility in good faith within the time prescribed by the commission and the prosecution thereof with reasonable diligence shall constitute an exercise of authority under the certificate.

For the purposes of this section, construction of any electric transmission line of one hundred thirty-eight (138) kilovolts or more and of more than five thousand two hundred eighty (5,280) feet in length shall not be considered an ordinary extension of an existing system in the usual course of business and shall require a certificate of public convenience and necessity. However, ordinary extensions of existing systems in the usual course of business not requiring such a certificate shall include:

The replacement or upgrading of any existing electric transmission line; or

The relocation of any existing electric transmission line to accommodate construction or expansion of a roadway or other transportation infrastructure; or

An electric transmission line that is constructed solely to serve a single customer and that will pass over no property other than that owned by the customer to be served.

Prior to granting a certificate of public convenience and necessity to construct facilities to provide the services set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f), the commission shall require the applicant to provide a surety bond, or a reasonable guaranty that the applicant shall operate the facilities in a reasonable and reliable manner for a period of at least five (5) years. The surety bond or guaranty shall be in an amount sufficient to ensure the full and faithful performance by the applicant or its successors of the obligations and requirements of this chapter and of all applicable federal and state environmental requirements. However, no surety bond or guaranty shall be required for an applicant that is a water district or water association or for an applicant that the commission finds has sufficient assets to ensure the continuity of sewage service.

No utility shall exercise any right or privilege under any franchise or permit, after the exercise of that right or privilege has been voluntarily suspended or discontinued for more than one (1) year, without first obtaining from the commission, in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, a certificate of convenience and necessity authorizing the exercise of that right or privilege.

No utility shall apply for or obtain any franchise, license, or permit from any city or other governmental agency until it has obtained from the commission, in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, a certificate of convenience and necessity showing that there is a demand and need for the service sought to be rendered.

No person shall acquire or transfer ownership of, or control, or the right to control, any utility under the jurisdiction of the commission by sale of assets, transfer of stock, or otherwise, or abandon the same, without prior approval by the commission. The commission shall grant its approval if the person acquiring the utility has the financial, technical, and managerial abilities to provide reasonable service.

No individual, group, syndicate, general or limited partnership, association, corporation, joint stock company, trust, or other entity (an “acquirer”), whether or not organized under the laws of this state, shall acquire control, either directly or indirectly, of any utility furnishing utility service in this state, without having first obtained the approval of the commission. Any acquisition of control without prior authorization shall be void and of no effect. As used in this subsection, the term “control” means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a utility, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by effecting a change in the composition of the board of directors, by contract or otherwise. Control shall be presumed to exist if any individual or entity, directly or indirectly, owns ten percent (10%) or more of the voting securities of the utility. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing that ownership does not in fact confer control. Application for any approval or authorization shall be made to the commission in writing, verified by oath or affirmation, and be in a form and contain the information as the commission requires. The commission shall approve any proposed acquisition when it finds that the same is to be made in accordance with law, for a proper purpose and is consistent with the public interest. The commission may make investigation and hold hearings in the matter as it deems necessary, and thereafter may grant any application under this subsection in whole or in part and with modification and upon terms and conditions as it deems necessary or appropriate. The commission shall grant, modify, refuse, or prescribe appropriate terms and conditions with respect to every such application within sixty (60) days after the filing of the application therefor, unless it is necessary, for good cause shown, to continue the application for up to sixty (60) additional days. The order continuing the application shall state fully the facts that make continuance necessary. In the absence of that action within that period of time, any proposed acquisition shall be deemed to be approved.

Subsection (7) of this section shall not apply to any acquisition of control of any:

Utility which derives a greater percentage of its gross revenue from business in another jurisdiction than from business in this state if the commission determines that the other jurisdiction has statutes or rules which are applicable and are being applied and which afford protection to ratepayers in this state substantially equal to that afforded such ratepayers by subsection (7) of this section;

Utility by an acquirer who directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, the utility, including any entity created at the direction of such utility for purposes of corporate reorganization; or

Utility pursuant to the terms of any indebtedness of the utility, provided the issuance of indebtedness was approved by the commission.

In a proceeding on an application filed pursuant to this section, any interested person, including a person over whose property the proposed transmission line will cross, may request intervention, and the commission shall, if requested, conduct a public hearing in the county in which the transmission line is proposed to be constructed, or, if the transmission line is proposed to be constructed in more than one county, in one of those counties. The commission shall issue its decision no later than ninety (90) days after the application is filed, unless the commission extends this period, for good cause, to one hundred twenty (120) days. The commission may utilize the provisions of KRS 278.255(3) if, in the exercise of its discretion, it deems it necessary to hire a competent, qualified and independent firm to assist it in reaching its decision. The issuance by the commission of a certificate that public convenience and necessity require the construction of an electric transmission line shall be deemed to be a determination by the commission that, as of the date of issuance, the construction of the line is a prudent investment.

The commission shall not approve any application under subsection (6) or (7) of this section for the transfer of control of a utility described in KRS 278.010(3)(f) unless the commission finds, in addition to findings required by those subsections, that the person acquiring the utility has provided evidence of financial integrity to ensure the continuity of sewage service in the event that the acquirer cannot continue to provide service.

The commission shall not accept for filing an application requesting authority to abandon facilities that provide services as set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f) or to cease providing services unless the applicant has provided written notice of the filing to the following:

Kentucky Division of Water;

Office of the Attorney General; and

The county judge/executive, mayor, health department, planning and zoning commission, and public sewage service provider of each county and each city in which the utility provides utility service.

The commission may grant any application requesting authority to abandon facilities that provide services as set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f) or to cease providing services upon terms and conditions as the commission deems necessary or appropriate, but not before holding a hearing on the application and no earlier than ninety (90) days from the date of the commission’s acceptance of the application for filing, unless the commission finds it necessary for good cause to act upon the application earlier.

If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions are declared to be severable.

HISTORY:

3952-25: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 83, § 5; 1974, ch. 388, § 3; 1978, ch. 379, § 6, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 130, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 368, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 12, § 3, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 22, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1988, ch. 335, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 102, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 144, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 388, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2001, ch. 35, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2004, ch. 75, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2016 ch. 50, § 1, effective April 8, 2016; 2018 ch. 171, § 9, effective April 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 207, § 9, effective April 27, 2018; 2019 ch. 66, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.